Massachusetts, session 194th, H1642.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 279 is hereby amended by striking out section 3 and inserting in place thereof the 
following section:           
Section 3. For the purposes of this section, probation officer shall include all personnel 
directed by the commissioner of probation, including but not limited to a chief probation officer, 
a regional probation supervisor, a statewide probation supervisor, the director of the ELMO 
center and the deputy commissioner of field services. At any time before final disposition of the 
case of a person placed under probation supervision or in the custody or care of a probation 
officer, the probation officer may arrest them without a warrant and take them before the court, 
or the court may issue a warrant for their arrest. When taken before the court, it may, if they have 
not been sentenced, sentence them or make any other lawful disposition of the case, and if they 

of 3 11 have been sentenced, it may continue or revoke the suspension of the execution of their sentence; 
provided however, that in all cases where the probationer is served with notice of surrender and 
at least one of the underlying crimes for which they are on probation is a felony, then the 
probation officer shall provide a duplicate copy of the notice of surrender to the district attorney, 
and the court shall provide to the district attorney the opportunity to be heard and present 
evidence at the surrender hearing. If such suspension is revoked, the sentence shall be in full 
force and effect. If a warrant has been issued by the court for the arrest of such a person and they 
are a prisoner in any correctional institution, jail or house of correction, the commissioner of 
correction, the sheriff, master or keeper of said house of correction, or in Suffolk county, the 
penal institutions commissioner of the city of Boston, as the case may be, having such prisoner 
under their supervision or control, upon receiving notice of such warrant, shall notify such 
prisoner that they have the right to apply to the court for prompt disposition thereof. Such an 
application shall be in writing and given or sent by such prisoner to the commissioner of 
correction, or such sheriff, master, keeper, or penal institutions commissioner, who shall 
promptly forward it to the court from which the warrant issued, by certified mail, together with a 
certificate of said commissioner of correction, sheriff, master, keeper, or penal institutions 
commissioner, stating (a) the term of commitment under which such prisoner is being held, (b) 
the amount of time served, (c) the amount of time remaining to be served, (d) the amount of good 
time earned, (e) the time of parole eligibility of such prisoner, and (f) any decisions of the board 
of parole relating to such prisoner. Said commissioner of correction, sheriff, master, keeper, or 
penal institutions commissioner shall notify the appropriate district attorney by certified mail of 
such application to the court. Any such prisoner shall, within six months after such application is 

of 3 33 received by the court, be brought into court for sentencing or other lawful disposition of their 
case as hereinbefore provided. 
In no case where a provision of this chapter provides for a finding, disposition or other 
order to be made by the court, or for a warrant to be issued, shall such be made or issued by any 
person other than a justice, special justice or other person exercising the powers of a magistrate. 
Notwithstanding any restriction in the preceding paragraph, if a probation officer has 
probable cause to believe that a person placed under probation supervision or in the custody or 
care of a probation officer pursuant to sections 42A, 58A or 87 of chapter 276 or any other 
statute that allows the court to set conditions of release, has violated the conditions set by the 
court, the probation officer may arrest the probationer or may issue a warrant for the custody of 
the probationer. The probation officer shall arrange for the appearance of the probationer before 
the next sitting of the court pursuant to the first paragraph of this section. Such warrant shall 
constitute sufficient authority to a probation officer and to the superintendent, jailer, or any other 
person in charge of any jail, house of correction, lockup, or place of detention to whom it is 
exhibited, to hold in custody the probationer detained pursuant thereto. The probationer shall be 
brought before the next session of the court having jurisdiction over the place where the person is 
held or to the court that set the condition of release.